Hawaii statutes.
[§185-1.5] Responsible agency. The
department shall take measures for the prevention, control, and extinguishment
of wildland fires within forest reserves, public hunting areas, wildlife and
plant sanctuaries, and natural area reserves and shall cooperate with
established fire control agencies of the counties and the federal government in
developing plans and programs and mutual aid agreements for assistance for the
prevention, control, and extinguishment of fires on forest, grass, brush, and
watershed lands not within the department's fire protection responsibilities
described above. [L 1953, c 100, §3; RL 1955, §19-51; am L 1957, c 98, §1; am L
Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS §185-1; am L 1974, c 64, pt of
§1; am L 1988, c 338, §1; ren and am L 1994, c 140, §2]

Revision Note

This section is former §185-1.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next